Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.450

Chapters 13.04 and 13.40 RCW as exclusive authority for adjudication and disposition of juvenile offenders—Chapter 10.22 RCW does not apply to proceedings under chapter 13.40 RCW.

The provisions of chapters 13.04 and 13.40 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, shall be the exclusive authority for the adjudication and disposition of juvenile offenders except where otherwise expressly provided. Chapter 10.22 RCW does not apply to juvenile offender proceedings, including diversion, under chapter 13.40 RCW.

[ 1985 c 257 s 5; 1981 c 299 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 257: See note following RCW 13.34.165.